Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.020

Boundaries—Territory excluded.

A district's boundary may include any part or all of any county and may include any part or all of any incorporated area located within the county. A district's boundary may not include any territory already being served by a cable TV system (CATV) unless on August 9, 1971, there is a translator station retransmitting television signals to such territory.

[ 1991 c 363 s 98; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.